Tennessee, session 114, HB2299.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-15-504, is amended by deleting
the language "sixty (60) days" and substituting "forty-five (45) days".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2299
012586
- 1 -